Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-220.04
State and county fairs; carnival companies, booking agencies, and shows; cash deposit; certified check; return; when.

If cash or certified check is deposited with the Nebraska State Fair Board, a county agricultural society, or a county fair board under section 2-220.01, such deposit shall be returned to the person or company making the deposit within sixty days after the completion of the last performance of the contract unless a written, signed, and verified complaint has been filed within such time.

Laws 1951, c. 5, § 4, p. 68;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 27;

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 11.